Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB236.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Conveyance in Rush Township, Schuylkill County.(a) Authorization.--The Department of General Services, with the approval of the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources and the Governor, is authorized on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania to grant and convey to the White Birch Golf Course and Restaurant certain lands situate in Rush Township, Schuylkill County. The purchase price shall be $1. Any conveyance under this act shall be made under terms and conditions to be established in an agreement of sale.(b) Property description.--The lands to be conveyed under subsection (a) consist of certain State park land located in Tuscarora State Park in Rush Township, Schuylkill County, having a length of approximately 500 feet and a width of approximately 1234567891011121314151617181920 100 feet, together with improvements thereon, used historically as a customer parking lot for the White Birch Golf Course and Restaurant and described in Land Use Agreement Number UA-101 made June 13, 1989, by and between the Bureau of State Parks and the White Birch Golf Course, Inc.(c) Existing encumbrances.--The conveyance authorized by this section shall be made under and subject to existing encroachments, all lawful and enforceable easements, servitudes and rights of others, including, but not confined to, streets, roadways and rights of any telephone, telegraph, water, electric, gas or pipeline companies, as well as under and subject to any lawful and enforceable estates or tenancies vested in third persons appearing of record, for any portion of the land or improvements erected thereon.(d) Condition.--The conveyance authorized by this section shall be made under and subject to the condition, which shall be contained in the deed of conveyance, that no portion of the property conveyed shall be used as a licensed facility, as the term is defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions), or any other similar type of facility authorized under State law. The condition shall be a covenant running with the land and shall be binding upon the grantee and the heirs and assigns of the grantee. If the grantee or the heirs or assigns of the grantee permit any portion of the property authorized to be conveyed in this section to be used in violation of this subsection, the title shall immediately revert to and revest in the grantor.(e) Easements.--(1) The Secretary of General Services may retain any easement from the property to be conveyed in accordance with 20250SB0236PN0189 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this section as the Secretary of General Services deems necessary or appropriate.(2) The Secretary of General Services may grant any future easement to benefit the property to be conveyed in accordance with this section, as agreed to between the property owner and the Department of General Services.(f) Costs and fees.--Costs and fees incidental to this conveyance shall be borne by the grantee.(g) Time for conveyance and alternate disposition.--If the conveyance authorized by this section is not executed within two years after the effective date of this subsection, the property may be disposed of in accordance with section 2405-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(h) Proceeds.--The proceeds from the conveyance authorized in this section shall be deposited into a fund under the jurisdiction of, and as prescribed by, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0236PN0189 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920